Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 268.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the requirements for  boundary changes under ORS 268.354
and ORS chapter 198, when  a city within the urban growth boundary of a metropolitan ser-
vice district annexes a territory under ORS chapter 222 and that territory  is within the ur-
ban growth boundary of the district, the territory is annexed to the district without further
proceedings.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to territories annexed by a city on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 268.354 is amended to read:
268.354. (1) In addition to the requirements established by ORS chapters 198,  221 and 222 for a
boundary change, a metropolitan service district, in consultation with the Metro  Policy Advisory
Committee, may establish requirements for a boundary  change that is subject to the jurisdiction of
the district pursuant to ORS 268.347.
(2) For a boundary change that is subject to the jurisdiction of the  district pursuant to ORS
268.347, the district shall:
(a) Establish a uniform hearing and notification process.
(b) Establish an expedited process for uncontested boundary changes.
(c) Establish clear and objective criteria for a boundary change.
(d) Ensure that a boundary change is in compliance with the Metro regional framework plan,
as defined in ORS 197.015, and cooperative agreements and urban service agreements  adopted pur-
suant to ORS chapter 195.
(3) The role of a metropolitan service district in the boundary determination  process shall be
ministerial only.
(4) Except as provided in this section and ORS  268.347 and 268.351, for a boundary change
subject to the jurisdiction of the metropolitan service district:
(a) Proceedings for annexation of territory to a city and for all other  changes in city boundaries
shall be conducted as provided in ORS chapter 222.
(b) Proceedings for annexation of  territory to a district, and for all other changes to the
boundaries of a district, shall be conducted as provided in ORS chapter 198. Notwithstanding ORS
268.020, as used in this paragraph, “district” has the meaning given that term in ORS 268.351.
Enrolled House Bill 2356 (HB 2356-A) Page 1
(c) Proceedings for annexation of territory to the metropolitan service  district, including
annexation of territory not within the urban growth boundary of the district, and  for all other
changes to the boundaries of the district shall be conducted as provided in ORS chapter 198.
(d) Notwithstanding contrary provisions regarding the party responsible for  conducting hearings
under ORS chapter 198, the metropolitan service district is the governing body responsible for con-
ducting proceedings for a minor boundary change to the district. Except for a change to the district
boundary by adoption of an urban growth boundary under ORS  268.390 or annexation under sec-
tion 2 of this 2025 Act , proceedings for a minor boundary change to the boundaries of a district
shall be conducted as provided in ORS chapter 198.
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2356 (HB 2356-A) Page 2